Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB724.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6060YC (2) 91 lh/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 9B.6A Failure to require personal 1 appearance ââ penalties. 2 1. A notarial officer who performs a notarial act without 3 requiring the personal appearance of the individual as required 4 under section 9B.6, or requiring the use of communication 5 technology in the case of a remotely located individual as 6 provided in section 9B.14A, commits a serious misdemeanor. 7 2. If the notarial act involves the transfer of real 8 property or an interest in real property, a violation of this 9 section is a class âDâ felony. 10 3. It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under 11 this section that the individual appeared before the notarial 12 officer and knowingly presented apparently valid proof of 13 identification, even if the individual was not in fact the 14 person identified in the proof of identification, or if the 15 remotely located individual provided apparently valid identity 16 proofing information in the case of a notarial act performed 17 under section 9B.14A. 18 Sec. 2. Section 22.7, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 19 following new subsection: 20 NEW SUBSECTION . 78. Any copy of photo identification 21 submitted to a county recorder pursuant to section 558.11. 22 Sec. 3. Section 558.11, Code 2026, is amended to read as 23 follows: 24 558.11 Record ââ constructive notice. 25 1. The evidence of title shall be filed with the recorder of 26 deeds of the county in which the real estate is situated, who 27 shall record the same, and place an abstract thereof upon the 28 index of deeds. The recording thereof shall be constructive 29 notice to all persons, as provided in other cases of entries 30 upon said index, and the recorder shall receive the same fees 31 therefor as for recording other instruments. 32 2. An instrument affecting real estate shall not be accepted 33 for recording unless one of the following applies: 34 a. If the instrument is filed for recording by a trusted 35 -1- LSB 6060YC (2) 91 lh/jh 1/ 6 H.F. _____ filer, all of the following apply: 1 (1) The instrument is signed by the grantor. 2 (2) The instrument is acknowledged or sworn to by the 3 grantor before and certified by a notarial officer, or in the 4 presence of two or more credible subscribing witnesses. 5 b. If the instrument is filed for recording by an individual 6 other than a trusted filer, all of the following apply: 7 (1) The instrument is signed by the grantor. 8 (2) The instrument is acknowledged or sworn to by the 9 grantor in the presence of two or more credible subscribing 10 witnesses. 11 (3) The instrument is acknowledged or sworn to by the 12 grantor, the grantee, and each subscribing witness before and 13 certified by a notarial officer. 14 (4) The instrument is accompanied by a copy of a valid 15 photo identification for the grantor and the grantee filing the 16 instrument for recording. 17 3. If an individual advises the recorder that an instrument 18 affecting real estate filed for recording is fraudulent, the 19 recorder shall notify the county attorney with jurisdiction 20 over the area in which the real property is located and shall 21 provide the county attorney with any photo identification 22 submitted pursuant to subsection 2, paragraph âbâ , subparagraph 23 (4). 24 4. For purposes of this section, âtrusted filerâ means an 25 attorney; a title agent; a title company; an escrow company 26 that provided closing, settlement, or other comparable 27 transaction services in connection with the transfer of real 28 property; a public utility; a governmental entity; or a person 29 acting on behalf of any such entity. 30 Sec. 4. Section 649.6, Code 2026, is amended to read as 31 follows: 32 649.6 Equitable proceedings. 33 1. In all other respects, the action contemplated in this 34 chapter shall be conducted as other actions by equitable 35 -2- LSB 6060YC (2) 91 lh/jh 2/ 6 H.F. _____ proceedings, so far as the same may be applicable, with the 1 modifications prescribed. 2 2. The clerk of the district court shall make available 3 a simplified form and instructions for filing a petition to 4 quiet title based on an allegation of a fraudulent attempted 5 conveyance. 6 3. In an action to determine and quiet title to real 7 property, if the court finds that a fraudulent attempted 8 conveyance occurred, the court shall quiet title in the 9 plaintiff and restore the plaintiff to the title and rights 10 held immediately prior to the attempted conveyance. 11 4. Notwithstanding any limitations imposed by court rule 12 relating to a maximum amount of damages or that limits the 13 grounds for which an expedited civil action may be brought, an 14 action under this section may be brought as an expedited civil 15 action if the petition includes a specific allegation that a 16 fraudulent instrument or attempted conveyance affects the title 17 to the real property. 18 Sec. 5. Section 714.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 19 following new subsection: 20 NEW SUBSECTION . 9A. A person commits theft if the person 21 does any of the following: 22 a. Brings about, or attempts to bring about, a transfer or 23 purported transfer of real property, title to real property, 24 or a nonpossessory interest in real property to a transferee 25 or intended transferee without the effective consent of the 26 owner of the real property or nonpossessory interest and 27 with the intent to deprive the owner of the real property or 28 nonpossessory interest. 29 b. Sells, transfers, or encumbers, or attempts to sell, 30 transfer, or encumber, real property, title to real property, 31 or a nonpossessory interest in real property with respect to 32 a person in exchange for a benefit from any person, without 33 the effective consent of the owner of the benefit and with the 34 intent to deprive the owner of the benefit. 35 -3- LSB 6060YC (2) 91 lh/jh 3/ 6 H.F. _____ Sec. 6. Section 714.8, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 23. Any of the following: 3 a. Intentionally or knowingly makes a materially false or 4 misleading written statement for the purpose of obtaining real 5 property or an interest in real property. 6 b. With the intent to defraud or harm a person by causing 7 one of the following: 8 (1) Another person, without that personâs effective 9 consent, to sign or execute any document affecting real 10 property or any personâs interest in real property. 11 (2) A public servant, without the public servantâs 12 effective consent, to file or record any purported judgment or 13 other document purporting to memorialize or evidence title to 14 real property or any personâs interest in real property, or a 15 lien or claim against real property or against any personâs 16 interest in real property. 17